src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.aff
# M
# I Coniugatzione in -are totu sas var. log./nuor.chentza sas formas 
# chi rechedint a.g. (as. abbóghino, annuntas in sa lista voc.)
SFX M Y 172
SFX M are amos are  #  abboghinamos, abbochinamos       
SFX M are amus are
SFX M are aus are
SFX M are ades are
SFX M are aes are
SFX M are ates are
SFX M are abo are
SFX M are aia are
SFX M are aio are
SFX M are ao are
SFX M are avo are
SFX M are abas are
SFX M are aias are
SFX M are ais are
SFX M are avas are
SFX M are abat are
SFX M are aiat are
SFX M are ait are
SFX M are avat are
SFX M are abamus are
SFX M are aiamus are
SFX M are aiaus are
SFX M are aimus are
SFX M are avamus are
SFX M are abazes are
SFX M are aizis are
SFX M are avazes are
SFX M are abant are
SFX M are aiant are
SFX M are aint are
SFX M are avant are
SFX M are ei are
SFX M are esi are
SFX M are eis are
SFX M are esis are
SFX M are eit are
SFX M are esit are
SFX M are emus are
SFX M are estis are
SFX M are eint are
SFX M are esint are
SFX M are hei [cg]are
SFX M are hesi [cg]are
SFX M are heis [cg]are
SFX M are hesis [cg]are
SFX M are heit [cg]are
SFX M are hesit [cg]are
SFX M are hemus [cg]are
SFX M are hestis [cg]are
SFX M are heint [cg]are
SFX M are hesint [cg]are
SFX M are emas are  #  chi abboghinemas 
SFX M are emus are
SFX M are edas are
SFX M are etas are
SFX M are ezas are
SFX M are hemas [cg]are
SFX M are hemus [cg]are  #  chi ischerbighemus  
SFX M are hedas [cg]are
SFX M are hetas [cg]are
SFX M are hezas [cg]are
SFX M are era are  #  chi abboghinera  
SFX M are ere are
SFX M are àrepo are
SFX M are ares are
SFX M are eras are
SFX M are eres are
SFX M are aret are
SFX M are eret are
SFX M are àremus are
SFX M are eremus are
SFX M are àrezis are
SFX M are erezis are
SFX M are arent are
SFX M are erent are
SFX M are hera [cg]are  #  chi ischerbighera  
SFX M are here [cg]are
SFX M are heras [cg]are
SFX M are heres [cg]are
SFX M are heret [cg]are
SFX M are heremus [cg]are
SFX M are herezis [cg]are
SFX M are herent [cg]are
SFX M are ade are  #  abboghinade
SFX M are ae are
SFX M are ate are
SFX M are àdemi are  #  abboghinàdemi
SFX M are àemi are
SFX M are àtemi are
SFX M are àdebbos are
SFX M are àebbos are
SFX M are àtebbos are
SFX M are àdennos are
SFX M are àennos are
SFX M are àtennos are
SFX M are àdedha are
SFX M are àdela are
SFX M are àela are
SFX M are àtela are
SFX M are àdedhas are
SFX M are àdelas are
SFX M are àelas are
SFX M are àtelas are
SFX M are àdedhu are
SFX M are àdedhos are
SFX M are àdelu are
SFX M are àelu are
SFX M are àtelu are
SFX M are àdelos are
SFX M are àelos are
SFX M are àtelos are
SFX M are adu are  #  abboghinadu
SFX M are atu are
SFX M are au are
SFX M are ados are
SFX M are atos are
SFX M are aos are
SFX M are ada are
SFX M are ata are
SFX M are adas are
SFX M are atas are
SFX M are andhe are
SFX M are anne are
SFX M are ando are
SFX M are endhe are
SFX M are enne are
SFX M are hendhe [cg]are  #  lighendhe
SFX M are henne [cg]are  #  lighenne
SFX M are àndhemi are
SFX M are ànnemi are
SFX M are hèndhemi [cg]are
SFX M are hènnemi [cg]are
SFX M are àndhedi are
SFX M are àndheti are
SFX M are ànnedi are
SFX M are ànneti are
SFX M are hèndhedi [cg]are
SFX M are hèndheti [cg]are
SFX M are hènnedi [cg]are
SFX M are hènneti [cg]are
SFX M are àndhelu are
SFX M are àndhelos are
SFX M are ànnedhu are
SFX M are ànnedhos are
SFX M are ànnelu are
SFX M are ànnelos are
SFX M are hèndhelu [cg]are
SFX M are hèndhelos [cg]are
SFX M are hènnelu [cg]are
SFX M are hènnelos [cg]are
SFX M are ànnedha are
SFX M are ànnedhas are
SFX M are àndhela are
SFX M are àndhelas are
SFX M are ànnela are
SFX M are ànnelas are
SFX M are hèndhela [cg]are
SFX M are hèndhelas [cg]are
SFX M are hènnela [cg]are
SFX M are hènnelas [cg]are
SFX M are àndhennos are
SFX M are àndhebbos are
SFX M are ànnennos are
SFX M are ànnebbos are
SFX M are hèndhennos [cg]are
SFX M are hèndhebbos [cg]are
SFX M are hènnennos [cg]are
SFX M are hènnebbos [cg]are
SFX M are àndhesi are
SFX M are ànnesi are
SFX M are hèndhesi [cg]are
SFX M are hènnesi [cg]are


# O
# Prima coniugazione in -are (solu var. nug./brabaxinas)
# chentza sas formas chi rechedint a.g.
SFX O Y 124
SFX O are amus are  #  abbochinamus
SFX O are aes are
SFX O are ates are
SFX O are abo are
SFX O are aio are
SFX O are ao are
SFX O are avo are
SFX O are abas are
SFX O are aias are
SFX O are ais are
SFX O are avas are
SFX O are abat are
SFX O are aiat are
SFX O are ait are
SFX O are avat are
SFX O are abamus are
SFX O are aiamus are
SFX O are àimus are
SFX O are avamus are
SFX O are abazes are
SFX O are aiatzes are
SFX O are àizis are
SFX O are avazes are
SFX O are abant are
SFX O are aiant are
SFX O are aint are
SFX O are avant are
SFX O are emas are  #  chi abbochinemas 
SFX O are emus are
SFX O are edas are
SFX O are etas are
SFX O are ezas are
SFX O are hemas [cg]are
SFX O are hemus [cg]are
SFX O are hedas [cg]are
SFX O are hetas [cg]are
SFX O are hezas [cg]are
SFX O are àrepo are  #  chi abbochinàrepo 
SFX O are ares are
SFX O are aret are
SFX O are àremus are
SFX O are aremus are
SFX O are àrezis are
SFX O are arezis are
SFX O are arezes are
SFX O are arent are
SFX O are ae are  #  abbochinae
SFX O are ate are
SFX O are àdemi are  #  abbochinàdemi
SFX O are àemi are
SFX O are àtemi are
SFX O are àdebbos are
SFX O are àebbos are
SFX O are àtebbos are
SFX O are àdennos are
SFX O are àennos are
SFX O are àtennos are
SFX O are àdela are
SFX O are àela are
SFX O are àtela are
SFX O are àdelas are
SFX O are àelas are
SFX O are àtelas are
SFX O are àdelu are
SFX O are àelu are
SFX O are àtelu are
SFX O are àdelos are
SFX O are àelos are
SFX O are àtelos are
SFX O are adu are  #  abbochinadu
SFX O are atu are
SFX O are au are
SFX O are ados are
SFX O are atos are
SFX O are aos are
SFX O are ada are
SFX O are ata are
SFX O are adas are
SFX O are atas are
SFX O are andhe are
SFX O are endhe are
SFX O are enne are
SFX O are hendhe [cg]are
SFX O are henne [cg]are
SFX O are àndhemi are
SFX O are ànnemi are
SFX O are hèndhemi [cg]are
SFX O are hènnemi [cg]are
SFX O are àndhedi are
SFX O are àndheti are
SFX O are ànnedi are
SFX O are ànneti are
SFX O are hèndhedi [cg]are
SFX O are hèndheti [cg]are
SFX O are hènnedi [cg]are
SFX O are hènneti [cg]are
SFX O are àndhelu are
SFX O are àndhelos are
SFX O are ànnelu are
SFX O are ànnelos are
SFX O are hèndhelu [cg]are
SFX O are hèndhelos [cg]are
SFX O are hènnelu [cg]are
SFX O are hènnelos [cg]are
SFX O are àndhela are
SFX O are àndhelas are
SFX O are ànnela are
SFX O are ànnelas are
SFX O are hèndhela [cg]are
SFX O are hèndhelas [cg]are
SFX O are hènnela [cg]are
SFX O are hènnelas [cg]are
SFX O are àndhennos are
SFX O are àndhebbos are
SFX O are ànnennos are
SFX O are ànnebbos are
SFX O are hèndhennos [cg]are
SFX O are hèndhebbos [cg]are
SFX O are hènnennos [cg]are
SFX O are hènnebbos [cg]are
SFX O are àndhesi are
SFX O are ànnesi are
SFX O are hèndhesi [cg]are
SFX O are hènnesi [cg]are
