src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbaitare/Ob
abballaviare/Ob
abbambicare/Ob
abbassiare/Mb
abbaticare/Ob
abbatzicare/Ob
abbituare/Mb
abbochinare/Ob
abbotzicare/Ob
abbranchiare/Ob
abbrentosicare/Ob
abbrodhiare/Ob
abbuchiare/Ob
abbulutziare/Ob
aberguare/Mb
acapidare/Ob
acavidare/Ob
acodiare/Ob
acudulare/Ob
acurciare/Ob
addenticare/Ob
addopiare/Mb
addoviare/Ob
addutuperiare/Ob
afachiare/Mb
afinicare/Ob
afortificare/Ob
aforticare/Ob
afraicare/Ob
afrischiare/Ob
afumadicare/Ob
afundhiare/Ob
afuriare/Ob
aggradherare/Ob
aggradiare/Ob
aggramustiare/Ob
aggraviare/Mb
aggretiare/Ob
aggromerare/Ob
allatzicare/Ob
alleriare/Ob
allodhiare/Ob
alloricare/Ob
ammaniare/Mb
ammiserare/Mb
ammodhicare/Ob
ammutriare/Ob
ammutricare/Ob
ampilare/Mb
apachiare/Ob
apantaviare/Ob
aparagulare/Ob
apedicare/Ob
apeicare/Ob
apichiare/Ob
apiligare/Ob
apitzicare/Ob
apodhicare/Ob
apredicare/Ob
apressiare/Mb
apretigare/Mb
apussiare/Ob
arrabbiare/Mb
arrasicare/Ob
astragare/Ob
astrolicare/Ob
autenticare/Mb
bajulare/Mb
bantzicare/Ob
barbulliare/Ob
bardiare/Ob
bentulare/Mb
bochinare/Ob
botzicare/Ob
brinchiare/Ob
cadhicare/Ob
cancarare/Mb
candhidare/Mb
cantzicare/Ob
carchitare/Ob
cariare/Mb
carricare/Ob
chilliare/Ob
classificare/Mb
codiare/Ob
comporare/Mb
cresimare/Mb
criticare/Mb
cutzicare/Ob
cuzicare/Ob
decumare/Ob
dedicare/Mb
delibberare/Mb
delliriare/Mb
denuntziare/Mb
depositare/Mb
disanimare/Mb
discodiare/Mb
educare/Mb
fabbricare/Mb
fartziare/Ob
finantziare/Mb
forroschiare/Mb
fortzicare/Ob
fravicare/Ob
frazicare/Ob
graminare/Ob
illassinare/Ob
illepiare/Ob
illimpiare/Ob
illonghiare/Mb
illuchidare/Ob
imbolicare/Ob
immazinare/Mb
incarrigare/Mb
indissiare/Mb
inghiriare/Mb
intitulare/Mb
intorticare/Ob
introitare/Mb
intunicare/Mb
invalidare/Mb
inzeniare/Mb
irbentulare/Mb
irberzinare/Ob
irbodiare/Ob
irbolicare/Ob
irdepidare/Mb
irfinicare/Ob
irvoidare/Ob
iscampiare/Ob
iscarbiare/Ob
ischerbicare/Ob
isciapunare/Ob
iscontriare/Mb
iscopiare/Mb
iscraricare/Ob
iscusiare/Mb
iscutzinare/Ob
isinnitare/Ob
ispropiare/Mb
ispulicare/Ob
isseperare/Ob
lacrimare/Ob
lastimare/Mb
laureare/Mb
lissentziare/Mb
maculare/Mb
mandhicare/Ob
manicare/Ob
mascarare/Mb
masticare/Ob
meicare/Ob
miliare/Ob
moricare/Ob
mossicare/Ob
muricare/Ob
nannicare/Ob
nechidare/Ob
negossiare/Ob
nudricare/Ob
obbricare/Ob
ocriare/Ob
ocupare/Mb
ordinare/Mbg
papuschiare/Ob
pastinare/Mb
pastoricare/Ob
pinnicare/Ob
piticare/Ob
pompiare/Mb
praticare/Ob
prudicare/Ob
pulicare/Ob
puntziare/Ob
ricoverare/Mb
rosicare/Ob
santificare/Mb
sapunare/Ob
seghedare/Ob
segherare/Ob
seghetare/Ob
semenare/Mb
seperare/Ob
sillabbare/Mb
sitziare/Ob
soricare/Ob
surbuschiare/Ob
telefonare/Mb
tesserare/Mb
topicare/Ob
trabicare/Ob
trachidare/Ob
travicare/Ob
trigulare/Ob
trivulare/Ob
tunicare/Ob
tziricare/Ob
tzochiare/Ob
zacarare/Ob
zubilare/Ob
